Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-704
Intersections between railroads and highways; prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to place any wire across any railroad track in this state at public highway crossings except in such manner as may be prescribed by the commission as provided in section 75-703.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 4, p. 1422;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 116.